Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3911
Exclusive and continuing jurisdiction.

Except as
otherwise provided in section 30-3910, a court that has appointed a guardian
or issued a protective order consistent with the Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship
and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act has exclusive and continuing jurisdiction
over the proceeding until it is terminated by the court or the appointment
or order expires by its own terms.

Laws 2011, LB157, § 15.